Hawaii statutes.
[§431:11-107.5] Supervisory colleges. [Section
effective January 1, 2016.] (a) With respect to any insurer registered
under section 431:11-105, and in accordance with subsection (c), the
commissioner may participate in a supervisory college for any domestic insurer
that is part of an insurance holding company system with international
operations to determine compliance by the insurer with this article. The
powers of the commissioner with respect to supervisory colleges shall include
but not be limited to:

(1) Initiating the establishment of a supervisory
college;

(2) Clarifying the membership and participation of
other supervisors in the supervisory college;

(3) Clarifying the functions of the supervisory
college and the role of other regulators, including the establishment of a
group-wide supervisor;

(4) Coordinating the ongoing activities of the
supervisory college, including planning meetings, supervisory activities, and
processes for information sharing; and

(5) Establishing a crisis management plan.

(b) Each registered insurer subject to this
section shall be liable for and shall pay the reasonable expenses of the
commissioner's participation in a supervisory college in accordance with
subsection (c), including reasonable travel expenses. For purposes of this
section, a supervisory college may be convened as either a temporary or
permanent forum for communication and cooperation between the regulators
charged with the supervision of the insurer or its affiliates, and the
commissioner may establish a regular assessment to the insurer for the payment
of these expenses.

(c) To assess the business strategy, financial
position, legal and regulatory position, risk exposure, risk management, and
governance processes, and as part of the examination of individual insurers in
accordance with section 431:11-107, the commissioner may participate in a
supervisory college with other regulators charged with supervision of the
insurer or its affiliates, including other state, federal, and international
regulatory agencies. The commissioner may enter into agreements in accordance
with section 431:11-108 providing the basis for cooperation between the
commissioner and the other regulatory agencies, and the activities of the
supervisory college. Nothing in this section shall delegate to the supervisory
college the authority of the commissioner to regulate or supervise the insurer
or its affiliates within the commissioner's jurisdiction. [L 2014, c 234, §6]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next